District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-1403

Appointment of committee to promulgate rules and regulations; composition and tenure.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 22, 1944, 58 Stat. 193, ch. 174, § 3
June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 246, ch. 273, § 1
Apr. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-59, § 2(a), (b), 27 DCR 983
Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-141, § 2(a), (b), 29 DCR 2867
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-230, § 201(a), 57 DCR 6951

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1003.
1973 Ed., § 32-783.

Editor's Notes

Advisory group to committee established: See Commissioner’s Order No. 71-13, dated January 19, 1971.